src/fst/morphology/affixes/verb_middle_affixes.lexc
LEXICON Filter-DO-IO-Other

! Only provide paths out of this lexicon for ditransitive forms whose direct
! object-oblique object combinations are semantically plausible.

! No DOBJ.1SG > IOBJ.1SG ("gave me to me") or DOBJ.1SG > IOBJ.1PL ("gave me
! to us").
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@ #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@ #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.4@ #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@ #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@ #;

! No DOBJ.2SG > IOBJ.2SG ("gave you to you") or DOBJ.2SG > IOBJ.2PL ("gave
! you to you guys").
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@ #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@ #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.4@ #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@ #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@ #;

! No DOBJ.1PL > IOBJ.1SG ("gave us to me") or DOBJ.1PL > IOBJ.1PL ("gave us
! to us").
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@ #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@ #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.4@ #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.2@ #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@ #;

! No DOBJ.2PL > IOBJ.2SG ("gave you guys to you") or DOBJ.2PL > IOBJ.2PL
! ("gave you guys to you guys").
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@ #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@ #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.SG@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.4@ #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.1@ #;
@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBLIQUENUMBER.PL@@U.OBLIQUEPERSON.3@ #;

! All 3SG/3PL/4 forms are fine, since combinations of subjects and direct
! objects in these persons that have special morphological realizations
! are handled elsewhere above.
@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@                       #;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@                       #;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.4@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@                       #;

! Indefinite direct object forms (e.g., "give *something* to IO") and areal
! object forms (e.g., "give it (place/space) to IO") are fine throughout.
@U.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@                                      #;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.AREAL@                                      #;


! Direct object experiencer verbs have direct object inflection only
! (interpreted as 'subject' in English translations; more restricted set of
! inflectional markers than with most direct objects, since no 3>3, reflexive,
! or reciprocal marking).
LEXICON DirectSubjectAffixes

! TODO: Discuss given objects in third-person forms with Bruce, then implement 
! U.DIRECTOBJECT.GIVEN/NONE as necessary.
@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@si                 DirectSubjectConative;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@ni                 DirectSubjectConative;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@mi                 DirectSubjectConative;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@nihi               DirectSubjectConative;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.1@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@nahi               DirectSubjectConative;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@nihi               DirectSubjectConative;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.2@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@nahi               DirectSubjectConative;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.3@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@@P.GI.ON@gimi      DirectSubjectConative;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.4@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@gu                 DirectSubjectConative;
@U.OBJECTPERSON.AREAL@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@gu             DirectSubjectConative;

! Direct object experiencer verbs may also contain a conative prefix, which
! has distinctive morphophonological characteristics (see notes above).
! The presence of a conative prefix is specified in a verb's lexical entry.
LEXICON DirectSubjectConative

@P.CONATIVE.ON@@P.PREFIX.OUTER@^H                              Only3SGSubject;
@P.CONATIVE.OFF@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                              Only3SGSubject;

! Impersonal and direct object experiencer verbs only have inner inflection
! for third-person singular forms.  This lexicon prevents forms with any other
! subject person-number combinations from being produced/recognized.
LEXICON Only3SGSubject

@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@                                     #;
